Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-239.02
Contractor receiving loan disbursement; agent of borrower; exception.

Any such contractor receiving such loan disbursements and any funds of the borrower in addition to such loan disbursements shall be deemed to have consented to comply with the requirements of section 76-239.01 as to the application of such proceeds, and shall be deemed to be the agent of the borrower for so much of such proceeds as are necessary for the payment of such lawful claims for labor and material; Provided, that the foregoing provisions shall not apply where the contractor and the borrower are one and the same person. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to require the contractor to keep such proceeds in a separate account or accounts or to prorate payment of such proceeds to such lawful claims for labor and materials.

Laws 1969, c. 612, § 2, p. 2491.